Georgia statutes. TITLE 1 General Provisions
CHAPTER 2 Persons and Their Rights

Cross references.

Duty of General Assembly to enact laws to protect rights, privileges, and immunities due citizens of state, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. VII.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 529), the General Assembly designated the English language as the official language of the State of Georgia.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of trial practice and procedure, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 433 (2004).

1-2-1.
Classes of persons generally; “natural person” defined; corporations deemed artificial persons; nature of corporations generally.

There are two classes of persons: natural and artificial.

“Natural person” means any human being including an unborn child.

Corporations are artificial persons. They are creatures of the law and, except insofar as the law forbids it, they are subject to be changed, modified, or destroyed at the will of their creator.

Unless otherwise provided by law, any natural person, including an unborn child with a detectable human heartbeat, shall be included in population based determinations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Detectable human heartbeat” means embryonic or fetal cardiac activity or the steady and repetitive rhythmic contraction of the heart within the gestational sac.

“Unborn child” means a member of the species Homo sapiens at any stage of development who is carried in the womb.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1582; Code 1868, § 1645; Code 1873, § 1651; Code 1882, § 1651; Civil Code 1895, § 1802; Civil Code 1910, § 2159; Code 1933, § 79-101; Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 3/HB 481.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added subsection (b); redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c); and added subsections (d) and (e).

Cross references.

Definition of “person” generally, §

1-3-3

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 1/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Living Infants Fairness and Equality (LIFE) Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 2/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(1) In the founding of the United States of America, the State of Georgia and the several states affirmed that: ‘We hold these Truths to be self evident, that all Men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Happiness —
that to secure these Rights, Governments are instituted among men;’

“(2) To protect the fundamental rights of all persons, and specifically to protect the fundamental rights of particular classes of persons who had not previously been recognized under law, the 14th Amendment to the United States Constitution was ratified, providing that, ‘nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws’;

“(3) Modern medical science, not available decades ago, demonstrates that unborn children are a class of living, distinct persons and more expansive state recognition of unborn children as persons did not exist when

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

(1992) and

Roe v. Wade

(1973) established abortion related precedents;

“(4) The State of Georgia, applying reasoned judgment to the full body of modern medical science, recognizes the benefits of providing full legal recognition to an unborn child above the minimum requirements of federal law;

“(5) Article I, Section I, Paragraphs I and II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia affirm that ‘[n]o person shall be deprived of life, liberty, or property except by due process of law’; and that ‘[p]rotection to person and property is the paramount duty of government and shall be impartial and complete.
No person shall be denied the equal protection of the laws’; and

“(6) It shall be the policy of the State of Georgia to recognize unborn children as natural persons.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 13/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any citizen of this state shall have standing and the right to intervene and defend in any action challenging the constitutionality of any portion of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 14/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “All provisions of this Act shall be severable in accordance with Code Section 1-1-3.”

Law reviews.

For survey article on business associations, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 13 (1982).

For article, “Rights: Afterthoughts,” see 27 Ga. L. Rev. 473 (1993).

For survey article discussing developments in law of business associations for the period from June 1, 1999 through May 31, 2000, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 95 (2000).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2019).

For comment, “Under Kemp’s Eye: Analyzing the Constitutionality of the Heartbeat Restriction in Georgia’s LIFE Act and its Potential Impact on Abortion Law,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2019).

1-2-2.
Categories of natural persons.

Natural persons are categorized, according to their rights and status, as:

Citizens;

Citizens of the United States but not of this state; and

Aliens.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1583; Code 1868, § 1646; Code 1873, § 1652; Code 1882, § 1652; Civil Code 1895, § 1803; Civil Code 1910, § 2160; Code 1933, 79-101.

Law reviews.

For article, “Compulsory Legal Segregation in the Public Schools, with Special Reference to Georgia,” see 5 Mercer L. Rev. 211 (1954).

For article, “Rights: Afterthoughts,” see 27 Ga. L. Rev. 473 (1993).

1-2-3.
Duration of citizenship.

Until citizenship is acquired elsewhere, a citizen of this state continues to be a citizen of this state and of the United States.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 54; Code 1868, § 50; Code 1873, § 47; Code 1882, § 47; Civil Code 1895, § 1806; Civil Code 1910, § 2163; Code 1933, § 79-202.

Cross references.

Determination of venue in proceedings against corporations, §

14-2-510

.

Determination of domicile of persons, T. 19, C. 2.

Determination of residence for purposes of voter registration, §

21-2-217

.

1-2-4.
Right of expatriation.

Except in time of war, every citizen of this state shall have the right of expatriation with a view to becoming a citizen of another country with which this state is at peace. Declaration or avowal of the intention to become a citizen of another country, accompanied by actual removal, shall be held to be a renunciation of all one’s rights and duties as a citizen.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 53; Code 1868, § 49; Code 1873, § 46; Code 1882, § 46; Civil Code 1895, § 1805; Civil Code 1910, § 2162; Code 1933, § 79-203.

1-2-5.
Reacquisition of citizenship by expatriated persons and descendants.

If a person expatriated under Code Section 1-2-4 acquires citizenship under some foreign power, he and his descendants who go with him for the purpose of residence may become citizens of this state again only after meeting the residence requirements and taking the oath of allegiance required of other foreigners as a condition to becoming a citizen of the United States by Section 1448 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 55; Code 1868, § 51; Code 1873, § 48; Code 1882, § 48; Civil Code 1895, § 1807; Civil Code 1910, § 2164; Code 1933, § 79-204.

1-2-6.
Rights of citizens generally.

The rights of citizens include, without limitation, the following:

The right of personal security;

The right of personal liberty;

The right of private property and the disposition thereof;

The right of the elective franchise;

The right to hold office, unless disqualified by the Constitution and laws of this state;

The right to appeal to the courts;

The right to testify as a witness;

The right to perform any civil function; and

The right to keep and bear arms.

All citizens are entitled to exercise all their rights as citizens, unless specially prohibited by law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 1585, 1586; Code 1868, §§ 1648, 1649; Code 1873, §§ 1654, 1655; Code 1882, §§ 1654, 1655; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1808, 1809; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2165, 2166; Code 1933, §§ 79-205, 79-206.

Cross references.

Sentencing of defendants guilty of crimes involving bias or prejudice, §

17-10-17

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Disability Constitutional Law,” see 63 Emory L. J. 527 (2014).

For article, “An Essay on Illusion and Reality in the Conflict of Laws,” see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 819 (2019).

1-2-7.
Rights of female citizens generally.

Female citizens are entitled to the privilege of the elective franchise and have the right to hold any civil office or perform any civil function as fully and completely as do male citizens.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1587; Code 1868, § 1650; Code 1873, § 1656; Code 1882, § 1656; Civil Code 1895, § 1810; Ga. L. 1896, p. 40, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2167; Ga. L. 1912, p. 62, § 1; Ga. L. 1916, p. 43, § 1; Ga. L. 1918, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 106, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 79-207; Ga. L. 1975, p. 779, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 826, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 1.

History of Code section.

The language of this section is derived in part from the decision in Ex parte Hale,

145 Ga. 350

,

89 S.E. 216

(1916).

Cross references.

Sex discrimination in employment, T. 34, C. 5.

1-2-8.
Rights of minors.

The law prescribes certain ages at which persons shall be considered of sufficient maturity to discharge certain civil functions, to make contracts, and to dispose of property. Prior to those ages they are minors and are, on account of that disability, unable to exercise these rights as citizens unless such minor becomes emancipated by operation of law or pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 11 of Title 15.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1588; Code 1868, § 1651; Code 1873, § 1657; Code 1882, § 1657; Civil Code 1895, § 1811; Civil Code 1910, § 2168; Code 1933, § 79-208; Ga. L. 2006, p. 141, § 2/HB 847; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-1/HB 242.

Cross references.

Capacity of minors to enter into contracts, §

13-3-20

.

Capacity of minors to apply for, receive, and repay educational loans, §

20-3-287

.

Age of majority, §

39-1-1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 79 (2006).

1-2-9.
Rights of citizens of the United States while in this state generally.

Such citizens of the other states of the Union as are recognized as citizens of the United States by the Constitution thereof shall be entitled, while temporarily within this state, to all the rights of citizens thereof, except the elective franchise, the right to hold office, and the right to perform such civil functions as are confined by law to citizens of this state.

History.

Laws 1785, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 364; Code 1863, § 1591; Code 1868, § 1654; Code 1873, § 1659; Code 1882, § 1659; Civil Code 1895, § 1813; Civil Code 1910, § 2170; Code 1933, § 79-301.

Cross references.

Determination of resident status of university students for tuition or fee purposes, §

20-3-66

.

Determination of residence for purpose of voter registration, §

21-2-217

.

License requirements for motor vehicles of nonresidents, §

40-2-90

et seq.

1-2-10.
Rights of citizens of other states or nations to sue or give evidence.

The citizens of other states of the United States or of foreign states at peace with this state shall, by comity, be allowed the privilege of suing in the courts of this state and of giving evidence therein, as long as the same comity is extended in the courts of the other states to the citizens of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1595; Code 1868, § 1657; Code 1873, § 1662; Code 1882, § 1662; Civil Code 1895, § 1817; Civil Code 1910, § 2174; Code 1933, § 79-305.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004).

1-2-11.
Rights of aliens generally; purchase, holding, and conveyance of realty.

Aliens are the subjects of foreign governments who have not been naturalized under the laws of the United States.

Aliens who are subjects of governments at peace with the United States and this state, as long as their governments remain at peace with the United States and this state, shall be entitled to all the rights of citizens of other states who are temporarily in this state and shall have the privilege of purchasing, holding, and conveying real estate in this state.

History.

Laws 1785, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 364; Laws 1849, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 367; Code 1863, §§ 1592, 1593; Code 1868, §§ 1655, 1656; Code 1873, §§ 1660, 1661; Code 1882, §§ 1660, 1661; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1814, 1816; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2171, 2173; Code 1933, §§ 79-302, 79-303.

Cross references.

Licensing of aliens as physicians, osteopaths, and other medical professionals, §§

43-34-28

,

43-34-30

.

Law reviews.

For article discussing inheritance by aliens, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For article discussing legal aspects of investments and trade in Georgia by foreign business enterprises, see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 629 (1976).